Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-204
Married woman; marriage solemnized out of state; property rights.

Any woman who shall have been married out of this state shall, if her husband afterwards becomes a resident of this state, enjoy all the rights as to property which she may have acquired by the laws of any other state, territory or country, or which she may have acquired by virtue of any marriage contract or settlement made out of this state.

Laws 1871, § 5, p. 68;

R.S.1913, § 1563;

C.S.1922, § 1512;

C.S.1929, § 42-204;

R.S.1943, § 42-204.